District of Columbia statutes.
1-319.01

Utilization by District government encouraged; exception.

It shall be the policy of the District of Columbia government to utilize volunteer citizens in as many governmental programs as is practicable to serve the interests of the community. No volunteer person shall be used to fill any position or perform any service which is currently being performed by an employee of the District of Columbia government.

History

June 28, 1977, D.C. Law 2-12, § 2, 24 DCR 1442

Cross References

Merit system, continuation of existing laws, see § 1-632.06.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-319.03, § 1-319.04, § 1-632.06, and § 8-151.07.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-304.
1973 Ed., § 1-215a.